Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.623

Employee commuting in state-owned or leased vehicle—Policies and regulations.

Pursuant to policies and regulations promulgated by the office of financial management, an elected state officer or delegate or a state agency director or delegate may permit an employee to commute in a state-owned or leased vehicle if such travel is on official business, as determined in accordance with RCW 43.19.622, and is determined to be economical and advantageous to the state, or as part of a commute trip reduction program as required by RCW 70A.15.4100.

[ 2021 c 65 s 33; 1993 c 394 s 3; 1979 c 151 s 119; 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s 15. Formerly RCW 43.41.140.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Finding—Purpose—1993 c 394: See note following RCW 43.01.220.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 167: See note following RCW 43.19.560.